Idaho, session 2025, H0475.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educational Support Pro-
gram's Division of Central Services $600,000 to be expended for operating
expenditures from the Public School Income Fund for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $600,000 from the General Fund to the Public School
Income Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. Of the additional amounts appropriated in Section 1 of this
act for the Public Schools Educational Support Program's Division of Central
Services $600,000 shall be considered expended from the General Fund for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. Any school district or public charter school that partic-
ipates in the transportation route software pilot program shall track all
necessary data to demonstrate the effectiveness of the program, including
costs and savings, if any, as a result of using routing software. Funding is
provided to allow for a two-year pilot program with the expectation that the
State Department of Education collect all necessary data from participating
school districts or public charter schools and report to the Legislature the
results of the pilot program. The first report shall be provided no later
than December 15, 2025. The second report shall occur as part of the budget
hearing in the 2027 legislative session.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.